Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2222.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2020, Fifth Special Session chapter 3, article 1, section 16, subdivision 34, is amended to read: Subd. 34. Chisago County; U.S. Highway 8 Reconstruction 8,000,000 (a) For a grant to Chisago County to predesign, design, engineer, and construct a reconstruction of marked U.S. Highway 8 from Karmel Avenue in Chisago City to Interstate 35 and pedestrian and bike trails along and crossings of this portion of U.S. Highway 8. This reconstruction may include expanding segments of U.S. Highway 8 to four lanes, constructing or reconstructing frontage roads and backage roads, and realigning local roads to consolidate, remove, and relocate access onto and off of U.S. Highway 8. This appropriation is for the portion of the project that is eligible for use of proceeds of general obligation bonds. deleted text begin This appropriation is available until the project is completed or abandoneddeleted text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642, the bond sale authorization and appropriation of bond proceeds for the project in this subdivision are available until December 31, 2029new text end . (b) Amounts planned by the Department of Transportation for the resurfacing of U.S. Highway 8, as reflected in MnDOT's Metro District Ten-Year Capital Highway Investment Study 2020-2029, shall instead be applied to the reconstruction of U.S. Highway 8 to supplement appropriations for that purpose from any fund in this section.